en: Flans
bg: Флан
ca: Flans
de: Puddingkuchen
es: Flanes
fr: Flans gélifiés, Flans
hr: Flancati
it: Budini, Budino, Flan
lt: Pudingas
nl: Flans

en: Refrigerated flan with eggs
ca: Flans d'ou, Flan d'ou
es: Flanes de huevo, Flan de huevo
fr: Flan aux œufs rayon frais
hr: Rashlađeni flan s jajima

en: Semolina puddings, Semolina desserts
de: Grießpuddings, Grießpudding
es: Sémolas de leche
fr: Semoules au lait
hr: Puding od griza
lt: Manų kruopų pudingas
nl: Griesmeelpuddings, Griesmeelpappen

en: Chia puddings
fr: Desserts aux graines de chia

en: Vegan panna cotta
fr: Panna cotta végétaliennes

en: Vegan rice puddings
fr: Riz au lait végétaliens
hr: Veganski puding od riže
lt: Veganiški ryžių pudingai

en: Vegan semolina puddings
fr: Semoules au lait végétaliennes

en: Vegan chocolate mousses
fr: Mousses au chocolat végétaliennes

en: Vegan creamy puddings
fr: Crèmes dessert végétaliennes
hr: Veganski kremasti puding
nl: Plantaardige vla's

en: Vegan chocolate puddings
fr: Crèmes dessert chocolat végétaliennes
hr: Veganski puding od čokolade
lt: Veganiški šokoladiniai pudingai
nl: Plantaardige chocolade vla's

en: Vegan vanilla puddings
fr: Crèmes dessert vanille végétaliennes
hr: Veganski puding od vanilije
lt: Veganiški vaniliniai pudingai
nl: Plantaardige vanille vla's

en: Vegan coffee puddings
fr: Crèmes dessert café végétaliennes
hr: Veganski puding od kave
lt: Veganiški kavos pudingai
nl: Plantaardige koffie vla's

en: Rice desserts
es: Postres de arroz
fr: Desserts de riz
hr: Deserti od riže
lt: Ryžių desertai
nl: Rijstdesserts

en: Cocoa rice desserts, Chocolate rice desserts
es: Postres de arroz con cacao, Postres de arroz con chocolate
fr: Desserts de riz au cacao, Desserts de riz au chocolat
hr: Deserti od kakao riže
lt: Šokoladinių ryžių desertai
nl: Rijstdesserts met chocola

en: Soy desserts, soy milk desserts, Refrigerated plain soy dessert
ca: Postres de soja
de: Soja-Nachtische, Sojamilch-Nachtische
es: Postres de soja
fi: Soijajälkiruoat
fr: Desserts au soja, Desserts soja, Dessert au soja nature rayon frais
hr: Deserti od soje
it: Dolci di soia, Dolci al latte di soia
lt: Sojų desertai, sojų pieno desertai
nl: Sojadesserts
pt: Sobremesas de soja

en: Soy-based creamy puddings, Flavoured soy dessert
fr: Dessert au soja aromatisé
hr: Desert s okusom soje
lt: Aromatizuoti sojų desertai

en: Chocolate soy puddings, cocoa soy puddings, Chocolate soy desserts, cocoa soy desserts
de: Soja Schokodessert, Soja Schokoladen Nachspeisen
es: Postres de soja con cacao, Postres de soja con chocolate
fr: Desserts de soja au chocolat, Desserts de soja au cacao
hr: Čokoladni sojini deserti
it: Dessert di soia al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai sojų desertai
nl: Sojadesserts met chocola

en: Vanilla soy desserts
es: Postres de soja con vainilla
fr: Desserts de soja à la vanille
hr: Deserti od vanilije soje
it: Dessert di soia alla vaniglia
lt: Vaniliniai sojų desertai
nl: Sojadesserts met vanille

en: Caramel soy desserts
fr: Desserts de soja au caramel
hr: Deserti od karamele soje
lt: Karameliniai sojų desertai

en: Non-dairy fermented foods
de: fermentierte Lebensmittel ohne Milch
es: Comida no láctea fermentada
fi: Ei-maitopohjaiset fermentoidut ruoat
fr: Produits végétaux fermentés
hr: Nemliječne fermentirane hrane
it: Alimenti fermentati non caseari
lt: Fermentuotas maistas be pieno
nl: Non-zuivel gefermenteerd voedsel
pt: Alimentos fermentados não lácteos